Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.780

Bonds not general obligation—Legislature may provide additional means of payment.

The bonds authorized to be issued pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.35.700 through 28B.35.790 as now or hereafter amended shall not be general obligations of the state of Washington, but shall be limited obligation bonds payable only from the special funds created for their payment. The legislature may provide additional means for raising money for the payment of interest and principal of said bonds. RCW 28B.35.700 through 28B.35.790 as now or hereafter amended shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive method for such payment. The power given to the legislature by this section to provide for additional means for raising money is permissive, and shall not in any way be construed as a pledge of the general credit of the state of Washington.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 90; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.780. Prior: 1961 ex.s. c 14 s 9. Formerly RCW 28B.40.780; 28.81.580.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.